Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-388
Residential facilities; detention after the age of majority.

No person admitted to a residential facility upon the application of his or her parent or parents shall be detained in a residential facility after attaining the age of majority as established by section 43-2101, as such section may from time to time be amended, unless a guardian for such person makes an application for continued residence for such person in the facility under section 83-383 or such person is committed as provided by law for involuntary commitments.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 8, p. 3066;

Laws 1981, LB 499, § 43;

Laws 1982, LB 264, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 37.